California statutes. Public Contract Code
Failure by the awarding state agency to send a negative post-evaluation to the department may be grounds for rejection of future contracts or modification of exemptions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 759, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10371.

The following provisions shall apply to all consulting services contracts:

(a) Each state agency shall, regardless of the fiscal amount involved, use available private resources only when the quality of work of private resources is of at least equal quality compared with the state agency operated resources.

(b) Each state agency shall, prior to signing a consulting services contract totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, prepare detailed criteria and a mandatory progress schedule for the performance of the contract and shall require each selected contractor to provide a detailed analysis of the costs of performing the contract.

(c) Except in an emergency, no consulting services contract shall be commenced prior to formal approval by the department or, if the department’s approval is not otherwise required, by the director of the state agency. No payments for any consulting services contract shall be made prior to this approval of the award.

For the purpose of this subdivision an “emergency” means an instance, as determined by the department, where the use of contracted services appeared to be reasonably necessary but time did not permit the obtaining of prior formal approval of the contract.

(d) No consulting services contractor shall be awarded a contract totaling five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more, unless all of the following apply:

(1) The state agency has reviewed any contractor evaluation form
 on file with the department in accordance with Section 10369.

(2) Each state agency shall require that a completed resumé for each contract participant who will exercise a major administrative role or major policy or consultant role, as identified by the contractor, be attached to the contract for public record and is made a part of the contract.

(3) The department shall notify a state agency seeking approval of a proposed contract within 10 working days if it has a negative evaluation in its files on a previous contract or contracts awarded to this contractor.

(e) The department may require special evaluation procedures for multiyear contracts or for contracts calling for special evaluation procedures beyond the post-evaluation.

(f) Any contract for
 consulting services awarded without competition shall be listed in the California State Contracts Register. The information contained in the listing shall include the contract recipient, amount, and services covered. The requirement of this subdivision shall not apply to any contract awarded without competition executed with an expert witness for purposes of civil litigation in a pending case.

(g) The department shall have the duty to restrict or terminate the authority of a state agency to enter into consultant contracts if the state agency has consistently avoided the proper preparation, retention, or submission of post-evaluation forms, as required by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 21.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10372.

On and after January 1, 2024, when seeking to award a contract for commercial rental car services, the department shall develop criteria to evaluate bidders, at least in part, based on the number of zero-emission vehicles or plug-in hybrid electric vehicles in their rental car fleet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 360, Sec. 2.   (SB 1010)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10381.

(a) The department shall ensure that all state agencies are kept fully informed of the department’s plans and procedures for implementing the provisions of this article. The department shall make information available on implementation procedures to all interested parties.

(b) The department shall ensure that every consultant services contract contains standard language that fully informs the contractor of his or her duties, obligations, and rights under this article, and any additional contractor rights and obligations which the department determines should be included.

(c) Each consulting services contract shall have a provision for settlement of contract disputes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 759, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Federal Surplus Personal Property [10383. - 10383.8.]

10383.

The Department of General Services is hereby designated as the agency for the State of California responsible for distribution of federal surplus personal property, excepting food commodities, in accordance with subdivision (j) of Section 203 of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949 (40 U.S.C. Sec. 484), as amended, and succeeds to and is vested with the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the State Department of Education with respect to the distribution of federal surplus personal property, excepting the duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction exercised by the State Department of Education with respect to the distribution of federal surplus food commodities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.1.

The department shall cooperate with the federal government and its agencies in securing the expeditious and equitable distribution of surplus personal property of the federal government, excepting food commodities, to eligible institutions in California, assist those institutions in securing that property, and do all things necessary to the execution of its powers and duties as the state agency for the distribution of federal personal surplus property, excepting food commodities, in accordance with subdivision (j) of Section 203 of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.2.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with, and may provide for utilization by, federal agencies, with or without payment or reimbursement, of the property, facilities, personnel, and services of the department in carrying out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.3.

The Director of General Services may create a committee to serve as an advisory body to the department to ensure that distribution of federal surplus personal property to eligible recipients will be accomplished fairly and equitably. In the event that such a committee is created, the membership shall be representative of a cross section of those institutions that are eligible recipients, and the members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their advisory function.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.4.

The department shall develop a detailed state plan of operation in accordance with subdivision (j) of Section 203 of the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended, and the Governor shall certify and submit the plan to the Administrator of the Federal General Services Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.5.

The cash resources of the Surplus Property - Hardware Program from surplus-personal property transferred to this state in accordance with the Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949 (40 U.S.C. Sec. 484(j)) shall be deposited in the Service Revolving Fund in the State Treasury, created pursuant to Section 16420 of the Government Code. All costs of the Department of General Services attributable to the distribution of surplus personal property pursuant to this article shall be paid from the Service Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.6.

The Department of General Services shall have the possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property real or personal held for the benefit or use of the State Department of Education in the performance of the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction pertaining to surplus personal property, excepting food commodities, that on the operative date of this section are vested in the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.7.

All officers and employees of the State Department of Education as mutually agreed by the Department of General Services to be on the operative date of this section serving in the state civil service, other than as temporary employees, and engaged in the performance of the function vested in the Department of General Services by this article shall be transferred to the Department of General Services. The status, position, and rights of such persons shall not be affected by the transfer and shall be retained by them as officers and employees of the Department of General Services pursuant to the State Civil Service Act, except as to positions exempt from civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.8.

The department may make all rules and regulations consistent with the law for the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this article. Those rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.   Effective June 13, 1984.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 8.5 of Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Purchase of Federal Surplus Property [10385. - 10389.]

10385.

The department may purchase, lease or otherwise acquire from the federal government or any agency thereof for use of state agencies, surplus real property, including buildings, fixtures, and equipment situated thereon, whenever in the department’s judgment the purchase or acquisition and the terms and conditions thereof are in the best interests of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10386.

Any and all negotiations with the federal government or its agencies for or in connection with the purchase or acquisition of such property, and all activities, functions and responsibilities pertaining thereto, are hereby vested in and shall be assumed and conducted exclusively by the department. No other state officer or agency shall, except on the authorization of the department, negotiate with the federal government or its agencies for or in connection with the purchase or acquisition of such property. Any state agency may inspect such property to determine whether the same would be useful in the performance of its duties and may make recommendations to the department concerning the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10387.

The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Keep in constant touch with federal agencies charged with the sale or disposition of federal property and secure from them full details as to the nature and availability of the property and the terms and conditions under which it can be purchased or acquired.

(2) Transmit information thus secured to all state agencies in order that they may possess complete and up-to-date information as to the nature and selling price of available property.

(3) Prescribe procedures consistent with this article to be followed by state agencies in requisitioning and paying for the property and inform them of the procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10388.

Unless otherwise prescribed by the department, state agencies desiring to purchase or acquire federal property shall submit their estimates or requisitions therefor to the department, and shall pay for the property, in accordance with existing laws governing state purchases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10389.

This article shall not apply to the Trustees of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 843, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. State Surplus Personal Property [10389.1. - 10389.2.]

10389.1.

The Department of General Services, if feasible and consistent with existing law, shall first offer appropriate state surplus personal property to school districts prior to offering that property to the public, except for property more appropriately suited for public safety uses. The department may offer school districts state surplus personal property at less than fair market value, if it is determined by the Director of General Services to be in the best interests of the state. The department shall develop policies and procedures for the implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 731, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10389.2.

(a) The department’s policies and procedures regarding the disposition of state surplus computers, laptops, monitors, and related computer equipment shall do all of the following:

(1) Facilitate the disposition of state surplus computers to further the state policy of bridging the digital divide, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 709 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) Authorize nonprofit entities that, in partnership with a school district, operate a public computer center to further the state policy of bridging the digital divide, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 709 of the Public Utilities Code, to be eligible for
 receipt of state surplus computers under Section 10389.1 and through approved disposition directly from a state agency.

(3) Include a procedure enabling state agencies with surplus computers to ascertain whether the nonprofit entities described in paragraph (2) are interested in receiving those surplus computers. The procedure shall include a preference for nonprofit entities within the same geographic region as the state agency in order to minimize transportation and disposition costs.

(4) Require that state agency documentation of the disposition of surplus computers include a certification that all confidential, sensitive, and personal information was removed from the computers prior to disposition.

(5) Require any nonprofit organization that obtains a computer from
 the department, pursuant to this article, to use the computer only for operating a public computer center and to prohibit the resale of that computer.

(b) The department, in collaboration with the California Technology Agency, shall promote increased awareness among state agency officials of the requirement to remove from all state surplus computers all confidential, sensitive, and personal information prior to any disposition of those computers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (SB 493)   Effective September 6, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.6. Recycled Oil Markets [10405. - 10409.]

10405.

The following definitions govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(b) “Industrial oil” means any compressor, turbine, or bearing oil, hydraulic oil, metal-working oil, or refrigeration oil.

(c) “Lubricating oil” means any oil intended for use in an internal combustion crankcase, transmission, gearbox, or differential or an automobile, bus, truck, vessel, plane, train, heavy equipment, or machinery powered by an internal combustion engine.

(d) “Procuring agency” means any state agency or any person contracting with that agency with respect to work performed under a contract for lubricating oil or industrial oil.

(e) “Recycled oil” means recycled oil, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Used oil” means used oil, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 25250.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Virgin oil” means oil which has been refined from crude oil and which has not been used or contaminated with impurities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1226, Sec. 3.   Note: See changes set forth in Governor's Reorg. Plan 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

Every procuring agency shall continuously review and revise its procedures and specifications for the purchase of lubricating oil and industrial oil to eliminate any exclusion of recycled oils and any requirement that oils be manufactured from virgin materials. This section does not prohibit a local agency from purchasing virgin oil products for exclusive use in vehicles whose warranties expressly prohibit the use of products containing recycled oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

Every procuring agency shall require that purchases of lubricating oil and industrial oil be made from the seller whose oil product contains the greater percentage of recycled oil, unless the procuring agency certifies that a specific oil product containing recycled oil is any of the following:

(1) Not reasonably available within a reasonable period of time.

(2) Unable to meet the reasonable performance standards of the procuring agency, including any warranty requirement.

(3) Available only at a cost greater than the cost of available virgin oil products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1226, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10408.

(a) Every procuring agency shall establish and maintain an affirmative program for procuring oils containing the maximum content of recycled oil.

(b) An affirmative program shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The placement of descriptions of the preference for recycled oil products in publications used to solicit bids from suppliers.

(2) Description of the recycled oil procurement program at bidders’ conferences.

(3) Discussion of the preference program in lubricating oil and industrial oil procurement solicitations or invitations to bid.

(4) Efforts to inform industry trade associations about the preference program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1226, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10409.

Every local agency, as defined in Section 17518 of the Government Code, shall purchase lubricating oil and industrial oil from the seller whose oil product contains the greater percentage of recycled oil, if the availability, fitness, quality, and price of the recycled oil product is otherwise equal to, or better than, virgin oil products. This section shall not prohibit a local agency from purchasing virgin oil products for exclusive use in vehicles whose warranties expressly prohibit the use of products containing recycled oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1101, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Conflict of Interest [10410. - 10413.]

10410.

No officer or employee in the state civil service or other appointed state official shall engage in any employment, activity, or enterprise from which the officer or employee receives compensation or in which the officer or employee has a financial interest and which is sponsored or funded, or sponsored and funded, by any state agency or department through or by a state contract unless the employment, activity, or enterprise is required as a condition of the officer’s or employee’s regular state employment. No officer or employee in the state civil service shall contract on his or her own individual behalf as an independent contractor with any state agency to provide services or goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 154, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

10411.

(a) No retired, dismissed, separated, or formerly employed person of any state agency or department employed under the state civil service or otherwise appointed to serve in state government may enter into a contract in which he or she engaged in any of the negotiations, transactions, planning, arrangements, or any part of the decisionmaking process relevant to the contract while employed in any capacity by any state agency or department. The prohibition of this subdivision shall apply to a person only during the two-year period beginning on the date the person left state employment.

(b) For a period of 12 months following the date of his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation from state service, no person employed under state civil service or otherwise appointed to serve in state government may enter into a contract with any state agency, if he or she was employed by that state agency in a policymaking position in the same general subject area as the proposed contract within the 12-month period prior to his or her retirement, dismissal, or separation. The prohibition of this subdivision shall not apply to a contract requiring the person’s services as an expert witness in a civil case or to a contract for the continuation of an attorney’s services on a matter with which he or she was involved prior to leaving state service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10412.

Each contractor who enters into a state contract with the state for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, shall be assigned an identification number by the department. Each contractor who has been assigned a number, shall list it on each contract he or she enters into with the state, regardless of the amount of the contract. In the case of a corporation or firm, the president’s assigned number shall be used exclusively on each contract. The assigned number shall remain unchanged regardless of future name changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10413.

Notwithstanding Section 10410, an employee or state officer, not including a member of the board of directors, of a district agricultural association formed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 3801) of Division 3 of the Food and Agricultural Code, subject to the approval of the board of directors of that association, may receive compensation or have a financial interest as described in Section 10410 for purposes of contracting
 or employment with another district agricultural association. Nothing in this section shall preclude the applicability of Sections 1090, 18000, and 19990 of the Government Code to officers and employees of a district agricultural association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   (AB 2396)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Remedies and Penalties [10420. - 10426.]

10420.

Every contract or other transaction entered in violation of any provision of this chapter is void, unless the violation is technical or nonsubstantive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10421.

The state, or any person acting on behalf of the state, may bring a civil action seeking a determination by the Superior Court that a contract or other transaction has been entered in violation of any provision of this chapter. If the court finds substantial evidence of such a violation, it may issue a temporary injunction to prevent any further dealings upon the contract or other transaction, pending a final determination on the merits of the case. If the action results in a final determination that the contract or other transaction has been entered in violation of this chapter, it shall be void, and the state or person bringing the action shall be awarded costs and attorney’s fees. This section shall not be construed to permit an award of costs and attorney fees to the person or entity contracting or otherwise transacting with the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10422.

Any officer or employee of the department who corruptly performs any official act under this chapter to the injury of the state is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10423.

Any person contracting with the state by oral or written contract who corruptly permits the violation of any contract made under this chapter is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10424.

Persons convicted under Section 10422 or 10423 are also liable to the state for double the amount the state may have lost, or be liable to lose by reason of the acts made crimes by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10425.

Willful violation of any other provision of this chapter shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1231, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

10426.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to intentionally disclose proprietary information obtained in the negotiation, execution, or performance of a consulting services contract, as defined in Section 10335.5, or an information technology contract, as defined in Section 11702 of the Government Code, with a state agency when the contracting party knew or should have known that the disclosure was likely to cause harm.

(b) A violation of this section shall be punishable as a misdemeanor and may be prosecuted by the Attorney General or by a local district attorney in the district in which the disclosure took place.

(c) (1) For the purposes of this section “proprietary information” shall include any information agreed by the contracting parties to be proprietary or any information that is designated by a contracting state agency to be proprietary. A contracting state agency shall specifically identify in the contract any information that is considered to be proprietary. The state agency shall make this designation only in cases where the state agency has reason to believe that the release of this information poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of the public or the state agency has reason to believe that the contracting party intends to sell the information. If the state agency makes a designation of proprietary information subsequent to the execution of the contract, the state agency shall make a good faith effort to amend the contract to incorporate the subsequent designation of proprietary information. A contracting state agency shall provide written notification to a contracting party of any information that, subsequent to the execution of the contract, is identified to be proprietary. A contracting party is not in violation of this section if that party discloses information prior to the receipt of the written notification.

(2) Any information that is required to be released or disclosed by a contracting party pursuant to a legal requirement, including an order of a court or regulatory agency, shall not be considered a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1097, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Exemptions [10430. - 10430.]

10430.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(a) The Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University, except that Article 9 (commencing with Section 10420) shall apply to the Trustees of the California State University.

(b) (1) Transactions covered under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), except that Sections 10295.3, 10295.35, 10295.4, 10296, 10365.5, 10410,
 10411, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 10475) shall apply to all transactions under that chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), Section 10365.5 shall not apply to incidental advice or suggestions made outside of the scope of a consulting services contract.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), Section 10365.5 shall not apply to a contract that is part of a single competitive procurement conducted in more than one stage for information technology goods or services, when the Director of the Department of General Services and the Director of Technology determine that there is no conflict of
 interest under Section 10365.5 and that it is in the best interest of the state to utilize this procurement method. Nothing in this section shall preclude the applicability of Section 12112 to this procurement method.

(B) The Department of General Services shall annually submit a report on its Internet Web site describing each determination granted pursuant to subparagraph (A), listing the basis for the determination, and disclosing the total amount of money paid or to be paid to the contractor under the contract that was the subject of the determination. The department shall provide notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 30 days of the posting of the report.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “information technology” means information technology goods or services, or both, as appropriate.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any entity exempted from Section 10295. However, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall be governed by this chapter, except as provided in Sections 10295, 10335, and 10389. The Department of Water Resources shall be governed by this chapter, except as provided in Sections 10295.6, 10304.1, 10335, and 10340.

(d) Transactions covered under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(e) Except as provided for in subdivision (c), members of boards or commissions who receive no payment other than payment for each meeting of the board or commission, payment for preparatory time, and payment for per diem.

(f) The emergency purchase of protective vests for correctional peace officers whose
 duties require routine contact with state prison inmates. This subdivision shall remain operative only until January 1, 1987.

(g) Spouses of state officers or employees and individuals and entities that employ spouses of state officers and employees, that are vendored to provide services to regional center clients pursuant to Section 4648 of the Welfare and Institutions Code if the vendor of services, in that capacity, does not receive any material financial benefit, distinguishable from the benefit to the public generally, from any governmental decision made by the state officer or employee.

(h) Subject to the approval of the Director of Developmental Services, or his or her designee, a state employee of the department who is qualified to provide necessary services for regional center consumers and has entered into a contract with a regional center for the purpose of developing
 regional center services. The state employee shall terminate employment with any state agency or department before providing services funded by the state, as specified in Section 10410, to one or more regional center consumers. A contract entered into by a regional center and a state employee, in his or her capacity as a private citizen, to develop regional center services does not constitute a state contract within the meaning of Section 1090 of the Government Code. Accordingly, the state employee has no financial interest in a state contract under these circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (AB 2764)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Minority Business Participation [10470. - 10474.]

10470.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Awarding department” means any state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer of an entity empowered by law to enter into contracts on behalf of the State of California.

(b) “Contract” includes any agreement or joint development agreement to provide labor, services, materials, supplies, or equipment in the performance of a contract, franchise, concession, or lease granted, let, or awarded for and on behalf of the State of California.

(c) “Contractor” means any person or persons, firm, partnership, corporation, or combination thereof which submits a bid and enters into a contract with a representative of a state agency, department, governmental entity, or other officer empowered by law to enter into contracts on behalf of the State of California.

(d) “Goal” means a numerically expressed objective which awarding departments and contractors are required to make efforts to achieve.

(e) “Minority business enterprise” means a business concern which is all of the following:

(1) At least 51 percent owned by one or more minorities, or in the case of a publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more minorities.

(2) Managed by, and the daily business operations are controlled by, one or more minorities.

(3) A domestic corporation with its home office located in the United States. 

(f) “Women business enterprise” means a business concern which is all of the following:

(1) At least 51 percent owned by a woman or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of the stock of which is owned by one or more women.

(2) Managed by, and the daily business operations are controlled by, one or more women.

(3) A domestic corporation with its home office located in the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10471.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all contracts awarded pursuant to Section 2910 of the Penal Code or Section 1753.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code by any state agency, department, officer, or governmental entity for construction, professional services, materials, supplies, equipment, alteration, repair, or improvement shall have statewide participation goals of not less than 15 percent for minority business enterprises, and not less than 5 percent for women business enterprises. These goals are also applicable to the overall dollar amount expended each year by the awarding department designated for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10472.

In awarding contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, the awarding department shall consider the responsiveness of a bidder to minority business enterprise and women business enterprise goals set forth in Section 10471.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 19, Sec. 4.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10473.

(a) Each awarding department shall establish a method for monitoring compliance with the minority business enterprise and women business enterprise goals required in this article.

(b) Each awarding department shall adopt rules and regulations for purposes of implementing this article. Emergency regulations consistent with the requirements of this article may be adopted without the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law if they are adopted within 90 days of the effective date of this article.

(c) In implementing the requirements of this article, the awarding department shall utilize existing resources such as the Office of Small and Minority Business, the Minority Business Development Agency, and the federal Small Business Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10474.

Commencing on January 1, 1989, and on January 1st of each year thereafter, each awarding department shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor on the level of participation by minority or women business enterprises in contracts identified in this article. If the established goals are not being met, the awarding department shall report the reasons for its inability to achieve these goals and shall identify remedial steps to be undertaken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Darfur Contracting Act of 2008 [10475. - 10490.]

10475.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) On September 21, 2004, in addressing the United Nations General Assembly, President George W. Bush affirmed the Secretary of State’s finding and stated, “At this hour, the world is witnessing terrible suffering and horrible crimes in the Darfur region of Sudan, crimes my government has concluded are genocide.”

(b) The federal government has imposed sanctions against the Government of Sudan since 1997. These sanctions are monitored through the United States Treasury Department’s Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC).

(c) Since 1993, the United States Secretary of State has determined Sudan is a country whose government has repeatedly provided support for acts of international terrorism, thereby restricting United States assistance, defense exports and sales, and financial and other transactions with the Government of Sudan.

(d) On December 31, 2007, President George W. Bush signed the Sudan Accountability and Divestment Act (Public Law 110-174). The legislation passed the Senate and the House of Representatives unanimously. That act authorizes state and local governments to adopt policies to divest from, and prohibit, contracts with problematic companies operating in Sudan’s oil, power, mineral, and military sectors. That act also prohibits the federal government from contracting with these companies.

(e) On September 25, 2006, Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger stated, “Divesting will show our defiance of a government that murders” when signing Assembly Bill 2941 into law enabling the nation’s two largest pension funds to divest from investments in Sudan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: Section 10480 suggests conditions for future repeal action.)
-------------------------------------------

10476.

As used in this article, the following definition applies:
